Virginia statutes. Title 64.2. Wills, Trusts, and Fiduciaries.
Chapter 2. Descent and Distribution.

§ 64.2-200.
Course of descents generally; right of Commonwealth if no other heir.

The real estate of any decedent not effectively disposed of by will descends and passes by intestate succession in the following course:

To the surviving spouse of the decedent, unless the decedent is survived by children or their descendants, one or more of whom are not children or their descendants of the surviving spouse, in which case, two-thirds of the estate descends and passes to the decedent’s children and their descendants, and one-third of the estate descends and passes to the surviving spouse.

If there is no surviving spouse, then the estate descends and passes to the decedent’s children and their descendants.

If there is none of the foregoing, then to the decedent’s parents, or to the surviving parent.

If there is none of the foregoing, then to the decedent’s siblings, and their descendants.

If there is none of the foregoing, then one-half of the estate descends and passes to the kindred of one of the decedent’s parents and one-half descends and passes to the kindred of the other of the decedent’s parents in the following course:

To the decedent’s grandparents, or to the surviving grandparent.

If there is none of the foregoing, then to the decedent’s uncles and aunts, and their descendants.

If there is none of the foregoing, then to the decedent’s great-grandparents.

If there is none of the foregoing, then to the siblings of the decedent’s grandparents, and their descendants.

And so on, in other cases, without end, passing to the nearest lineal ancestors, and the descendants of such ancestors.

If there are no surviving kindred of one of the decedent’s parents, the whole estate descends and passes to the surviving kindred of the other of the decedent’s parents. If there are no kindred of either parent, the whole estate descends and passes to the kindred of the decedent’s most recent spouse, if any, provided that the decedent and the spouse were married at the time of the spouse’s death, as if such spouse had died intestate and entitled to the estate.

If there is no other heir of a decedent’s real estate, such real estate is subject to escheat to the Commonwealth in accordance with Chapter 24 (§

55.1-2400

et seq.) of Title 55.1.

History.

Code 1950, §

64-1

; 1956, c. 109; 1968, c. 656, § 64.1-1; 1977, c. 474; 1982, c. 304; 1985, c. 189; 1990, c. 831; 2012, c. 614; 2020, c. 900.

Editor’s note.

To conform to the recodification of Title 55 by Acts 2019, c. 712, effective October 1, 2019, the following substitution was made at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission: substituted “Chapter 24 (§

55.1-2400

et seq.) of Title 55.1” for “Chapter 10 (§ 55-168 et seq.) of Title 55.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 900, in subdivision A 4 and in subdivision A 5 d, substituted “siblings” for “brothers and sisters”; in subdivision A 5, substituted “kindred of one of the decedent’s parents” for “paternal kindred” and “kindred of the other of the decedent’s parents” for “maternal kindred of the decedent”; in subsection B, substituted “If there are no surviving kindred of one of the decedent’s parents, the whole estate descends and passes to the surviving kindred of the other of the decedent’s parents” for “If there are either no surviving paternal kindred or no surviving maternal kindred, the whole estate descends and passes to the paternal or maternal kindred who survive the decedent” in the first sentence and “no kindred of either parent” for “neither maternal nor paternal kindred” in the second sentence.

Law Review.

For comment on right of election against a foreign testator’s will, see 25 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 328 (1968).

For survey of Virginia law on wills, trusts and estates for the year 1967-1978, see 54 Va. L. Rev. 1664 (1968).

for the year 1968-1969, see 55 Va. L. Rev. 1534 (1969).

for the year 1969-1970, see 56 Va. L. Rev. 1559 (1970).

For article, “Updating Virginia’s Probate Law,” see 4 U. Rich. L. Rev. 223 (1970).

For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1971-1972, see 58 Va. L. Rev. 1257 (1972).

For article, “Inheritance Rights of Children in Virginia,” see 12 U. Rich. L. Rev. 275 (1978).

For 1985 survey of Virginia wills, trusts, and estate law, see 19 U. Rich L. Rev. 779 (1985).

For annual survey of Virginia law article, “Wills, Trusts, and Estates,” see 47 U. Rich. L. Rev. 343 (2012).

Research References.

Harrison on Wills and Administration for Virginia and West Virginia (Matthew Bender). Chapter 2A The Elective Share. 2A.03 The Elective Share — Decedent Dying Before January 1, 2001, et seq. Cox.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 6-301 Complaint to Construe a Will; No. 15-105 Will Directing that Property Shall Pass According to Laws of Descent and Distribution; No. 15-207 Bequest or Devise to Minor; No. 15-427 List of Heirs, et seq.; No. 16-512 Deed by Heirs; No. 16-2001 Affidavit of Heirs — Establishing Ownership, et seq.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

8A M.J. Executors and Administrators, § 18.

§ 64.2-201.
Distribution of personal estate; right of Commonwealth if no other distributee.

The surplus of the personal estate or any part thereof of any decedent, after payment of funeral expenses, charges of administration, and debts, and subject to the provisions of Article 2 (§

64.2-309

et seq.) of Chapter 3, not effectively disposed of by will passes by intestate succession and is distributed to the same persons, and in the same proportions, as real estate descends pursuant to §

64.2-200

.

If there is no other distributee of a decedent’s personal estate, such personal estate shall accrue to the Commonwealth.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 64-11, 64-12; 1968, c. 656, §§ 64.1-11, 64.1-12; 1978, c. 647; 1981, c. 580; 1982, c. 304; 1983, c. 320; 2012, c. 614.

Law Review.

For article, “Updating Virginia’s Probate Law,” see 4 U. Rich. L. Rev. 223 (1970).

For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1969-1970, see 56 Va. L. Rev. 1411 (1970).

For survey of Virginia law on taxation for the year 1972-1973, see 59 Va. L. Rev. 1584 (1973).

For survey of Virginia law on wills, trusts and estates for the year 1972-1973, see 59 Va. L. Rev. 1621 (1973).

For article, “Inheritance Rights of Children in Virginia,” see 12 U. Rich. L. Rev. 275 (1978).

For survey of Virginia law on wills, trusts, and estates for year 1979-80, see 67 Va. L. Rev. 369 (1981).

For 2002 survey of Virginia law on wills, trusts, and estates, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 357 (2002).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 5-1104 Complaint for an Accounting Following Election Under Augmented Estate, et seq.; No. 15-105 Will Directing that Property Shall Pass According to Laws of Descent and Distribution.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

8A M.J. Executors and Administrators, § 98.

§ 64.2-202.
When persons take per capita and when per stirpes; collaterals of the half blood.

A decedent’s estate, or each half portion of such estate when division is required by subdivision A 5 of §

64.2-200

, shall, except when otherwise provided in subdivision A 1 of §

64.2-200

, be divided into as many equal shares as there are (i) heirs and distributees who are in the closest degree of kinship to the decedent and (ii) deceased persons, if any, in the same degree of kinship to the decedent who, if living, would have been heirs and distributees and who left descendants surviving at the time of the decedent’s death. One share of the estate or half portion thereof shall descend and pass to each such heir and distributee and one share shall descend and pass per stirpes to such descendants.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection A, collaterals of the half blood shall inherit only half as much as those of the whole blood.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 64-2, 64-3; 1968, c. 656, §§ 64.1-2, 64.1-3; 1986, c. 305; 2012, c. 614.

Law Review.

For article, “Updating Virginia’s Probate Law,” see 4 U. Rich. L. Rev. 223 (1970).

For survey of Virginia law on wills, trusts and estates for the year 1969-1970, see 56 Va. L. Rev. 1559 (1970).

For survey of Virginia law on wills, trusts, and estates for year 1979-80, see 67 Va. L. Rev. 369 (1981).

§ 64.2-203.
Inheritance rights of certain individuals.

Except as otherwise provided by law, no person is barred from inheriting because such person or a person through whom he claims his inheritance is or has been an alien.

A person who is related to the decedent through two lines of relationship is entitled to only a single share based on the relationship that would entitle him to the larger share.

History.

Code 1950, § 64-4; 1968, c. 656, § 64.1-4; 1978, c. 647, § 64.1-6.1; 2012, c. 614.

§ 64.2-204.
Afterborn heirs.

Relatives of the decedent conceived before his death but born thereafter, and children resulting from assisted conception born after the decedent’s death who are determined to be relatives of the decedent as provided in Chapter 9 (§

20-156

et seq.) of Title 20, shall inherit as if they had been born during the lifetime of the decedent.

History.

1978, c. 647, § 64.1-8.1; 1994, c. 919; 2012, c. 614.

Law Review.

For article, “Inheritance Rights of Children in Virginia,” see 12 U. Rich. L. Rev. 275 (1978).

For article, “Dead Men Reproducing: Responding to the Existence of Afterdeath Children,” see 16 Geo. Mason L. Rev. 403 (2009).

§ 64.2-205.
Right of entry or action for land not affected by descent cast.

The right to make entry on or bring an action to recover land is not tolled or defeated by descent cast.

History.

Code 1950, § 64-10; 1968, c. 656, § 64.1-10; 2012, c. 614.

§ 64.2-206.
Advancements brought into hotchpot.

When the descendant of a decedent receives any property as an advancement from the decedent during the decedent’s lifetime or under the decedent’s will, and the descendant, or any descendant of his, is also to receive a distribution of any portion of the decedent’s intestate estate, real or personal, the advancement shall be brought into hotchpot with the intestate estate and the descendant is entitled to his proper portion of the entire intestate estate, including such advancement.

History.

Code 1950, § 64-17; 1968, c. 656, § 64.1-17; 2012, c. 614.

Law Review.

For article, “Inheritance Rights of Children in Virginia,” see 12 U. Rich. L. Rev. 275 (1978).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 15-247 Advancements.